Hawaii statutes.
§802-5 Appointment of counsel;
compensation. (a) Except as provided in section 334-126(f), when it shall
appear to a judge that a person requesting the appointment of counsel satisfies
the requirements of this chapter, the judge shall appoint counsel to represent
the person at all stages of the proceedings, including appeal, if any. If
conflicting interests exist, or if the interests of justice require, the court
may appoint private counsel, who shall receive reasonable compensation for
necessary expenses, including travel, the amount of which shall be determined
by the court, and reasonable fees pursuant to subsection (b). All expenses and
fees shall be ordered by the court. Duly ordered payment shall be made upon
vouchers approved by the director of finance and warrants drawn by the
comptroller.

(b) The court shall determine the amount of
reasonable compensation to appointed counsel, based on the rate of $90 an hour;
provided that the maximum allowable fee shall not exceed the following
schedule:

(1) Any felony case $6,000

(2) Misdemeanor case-jury trial 3,000

(3) Misdemeanor case-jury waived 1,500

(4) Appeals 5,000

(5) Petty misdemeanor case 900

(6) Any other type of administrative or

judicial proceeding, including cases

arising under section 571‑11(1),

571‑14(a)(1), or 571‑14(a)(2) 3,000.

Payment in excess of any maximum provided for
under paragraphs (1) to (6) may be made whenever the court in which the
representation was rendered certifies that the amount of the excess payment is
necessary to provide fair compensation and the payment is approved by the
administrative judge of that court.

(c) The public defender and the judiciary
shall submit to the department of budget and finance for inclusion in the
department's budget request for each fiscal biennium, the amount required for
each fiscal year for the payment of fees and expenses pursuant to this section.
[L 1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-5; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L Sp 1981
1st, c 22, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 227, §1; am L 2004, c 202, §78; am L
2005, c 86, §§1, 2; am L 2006, c 94, §1 and c 133, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1; am
L 2015, c 231, §6]

Case Notes

Total fees cannot exceed twice the maximum scheduled fee. 66
H. 366, 663 P.2d 630 (1983).

The language of this section does not empower the Hawaii
supreme court to compensate attorneys for services rendered before the United
States Supreme Court. 95 H. 28, 18 P.3d 890 (2001).

Under subsection (b), both the trial judge and the
administrative judge independently review excess fee requests to determine
whether a fee award is "fair compensation"; both the trial judge's
and the administrative judge's orders awarding fees under subsection (b) are
judicial acts subject to appellate review under the abuse of discretion standard;
to enable appellate review of excess fee awards, if a fee request is reduced,
it is necessary for the judge reducing the request to set forth reasons for the
reduction in order to determine whether the judge abused the judge's discretion
in ordering reduced fees. 126 H. 26, 265 P.3d 1122 (2011).

"Case" means all matters within numbered case, not
each count. 6 H. App. 20, 709 P.2d 105 (1985).

Where record indicated petitioner did not waive right to
appeal and trial counsel did not take steps to prosecute appeal, petitioner's
allegation of denial of effective assistance of counsel on appeal presented
colorable claim for post-conviction relief. 81 H. 185 (App.), 914 P.2d 1378
(1996).

Discussed: 97 H. 1, 32 P.3d 647 (2001).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next